Florida, session 2026, SB896.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 56 30.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 57 30.15âPowers, duties, and obligations.â 58 (1)âSheriffs, in their respective counties, in person or by 59 deputy, shall: 60 (k)âAssist district school boards and charter school 61 governing boards in complying with, or public postsecondary 62 educational institutions, as described in s. 1000.04(3), and 63 private schools or child care facilities, as defined in s. 64 402.302, in exercising options in, s. 1006.12. A sheriff shall, 65 at a minimum, provide access to a Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, 66 and Coach Scott Beigel Guardian Program to aid in the prevention 67 or abatement of active assailant incidents on school premises, 68 as required under this paragraph. Persons certified as school 69 guardians pursuant to this paragraph have no authority to act in 70 any law enforcement capacity except to the extent necessary to 71 prevent or abate an active assailant incident. 72 1.a.âIf a local school board has voted by a majority to 73 implement a guardian program or has contracted for the use of 74 school security guards to satisfy the requirements of s. 75 1006.12, the sheriff in that county must establish a guardian 76 program to provide training for school guardians or school 77 security guards, pursuant to subparagraph 2., to school 78 district, charter school, public postsecondary educational 79 institution, private school, child care facility, or security 80 agency employees, either directly or through a contract with 81 another sheriffâs office that has established a guardian 82 program. The security agency employing a school security guard 83 is responsible for all training and screening-related costs for 84 a school security guard, but such charges may not exceed the 85 actual cost incurred by the sheriff to provide the training. 86 b.âA public postsecondary educational institution or 87 charter school governing board in a school district that has not 88 voted, or has declined, to implement a guardian program may 89 request the sheriff in the county to establish a guardian 90 program for the purpose of training the public postsecondary 91 educational institution or charter school employees or school 92 security guards consistent with the requirements of subparagraph 93 2. If the county sheriff denies the request, the public 94 postsecondary educational institution or charter school 95 governing board may contract with a sheriff that has established 96 a guardian program to provide such training. The public 97 postsecondary educational institution or charter school 98 governing board must notify the superintendent and the sheriff 99 in the public postsecondary educational institutionâs or charter 100 schoolâs county of the contract prior to its execution. The 101 security agency employing a school security guard is responsible 102 for all training and screening-related costs for a school 103 security guard, but such charges may not exceed the actual cost 104 incurred by the sheriff to provide the training. 105 c.âA private school or child care facility in a school 106 district that has not voted, or has declined, to implement a 107 guardian program may request that the sheriff in the county of 108 the private school or child care facility establish a guardian 109 program for the purpose of training private school employees, 110 child care facility employees, or school security guards. If the 111 county sheriff denies the request, the private school or child 112 care facility may contract with a sheriff from another county 113 who has established a guardian program under subparagraph 2. to 114 provide such training. The private school or child care facility 115 must notify the sheriff in the private schoolâs or child care 116 facilityâs county of the contract with a sheriff from another 117 county before its execution. The private school, child care 118 facility, or security agency is responsible for all training and 119 screening-related costs for a school guardian program. The 120 sheriff providing such training must ensure that any moneys paid 121 by a private school, child care facility, or security agency are 122 not commingled with any funds provided by the state to the 123 sheriff as reimbursement for screening-related and training 124 related costs of any school district or charter school employee. 125 d.âThe training program required in sub-subparagraph 2.b. 126 is a standardized statewide curriculum, and each sheriff 127 providing such training shall adhere to the course of 128 instruction specified in that sub-subparagraph. This 129 subparagraph does not prohibit a sheriff from providing 130 additional training. A school guardian or school security guard 131 who has completed the training program required in sub 132 subparagraph 2.b. may not be required to attend another 133 sheriffâs training program pursuant to that sub-subparagraph 134 unless there has been at least a 1-year break in his or her 135 appointment as a guardian or employment by a security agency as 136 a school security guard in a school. 137 e.âThe sheriff conducting the training pursuant to 138 subparagraph 2. for school district, and charter school, or 139 public postsecondary educational institution employees will be 140 reimbursed for screening-related and training-related costs and 141 for providing a one-time stipend of $500 to each school guardian 142 who participates in the school guardian program. 143 f.âThe sheriff may waive the training and screening-related 144 costs for a private school or child care facility for a school 145 guardian program. Funds provided pursuant to sub-subparagraph e. 146 may not be used to subsidize any costs that have been waived by 147 the sheriff. The sheriff may not waive the training and 148 screening-related costs required to be paid by a security agency 149 for initial training or ongoing training of a school security 150 guard. 151 g.âA person who is certified and in good standing under the 152 Florida Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission, who 153 meets the qualifications established in s. 943.13, and who is 154 otherwise qualified for the position of a school guardian or 155 school security guard may be certified as a school guardian or 156 school security guard by the sheriff without completing the 157 training requirements of sub-subparagraph 2.b. However, a person 158 certified as a school guardian or school security guard under 159 this sub-subparagraph must meet the requirements of sub 160 subparagraphs 2.c.-e. 161 2.âA sheriff who establishes a program shall consult with 162 the Department of Law Enforcement on programmatic guiding 163 principles, practices, and resources, and shall certify as 164 school guardians, without the power of arrest, school employees, 165 as specified in s. 1006.12(3), or shall certify as school 166 security guards those persons employed by a security agency who 167 meet the criteria specified in s. 1006.12(4), and who: 168 a.âHold a valid license issued under s. 790.06 or are 169 otherwise eligible to possess or carry a concealed firearm under 170 chapter 790. 171 b.âAfter satisfying the requirements of s. 1006.12(7), 172 complete a 144-hour training program, consisting of 12 hours of 173 training to improve the school guardianâs knowledge and skills 174 necessary to respond to and de-escalate incidents on school 175 premises and 132 total hours of comprehensive firearm safety and 176 proficiency training conducted by Criminal Justice Standards and 177 Training Commission-certified instructors, which must include: 178 (I)âEighty hours of firearms instruction based on the 179 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commissionâs Law 180 Enforcement Academy training model, which must include at least 181 10 percent but no more than 20 percent more rounds fired than 182 associated with academy training. Program participants must 183 achieve an 85 percent pass rate on the firearms training. 184 (II)âSixteen hours of instruction in precision pistol. 185 (III)âEight hours of discretionary shooting instruction 186 using state-of-the-art simulator exercises. 187 (IV)âSixteen hours of instruction in active shooter or 188 assailant scenarios. 189 (V)âEight hours of instruction in defensive tactics. 190 (VI)âFour hours of instruction in legal issues. 191 c.âPass a psychological evaluation administered by a 192 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the 193 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the 194 evaluation to the sheriffâs office. The Department of Law 195 Enforcement is authorized to provide the sheriffâs office with 196 mental health and substance abuse data for compliance with this 197 paragraph. 198 d.âSubmit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent 199 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s. 200 112.0455 and the sheriffâs office. 201 e.âSuccessfully complete ongoing training, weapon 202 inspection, and firearm qualification on at least an annual 203 basis. 204 205 The sheriff who conducts the guardian training or waives the 206 training requirements for a person under sub-subparagraph 1.g. 207 shall issue a school guardian certificate to persons who meet 208 the requirements of this section to the satisfaction of the 209 sheriff, and shall maintain documentation of weapon and 210 equipment inspections, as well as the training, certification, 211 inspection, and qualification records of each school guardian 212 certified by the sheriff. A person who is certified under this 213 paragraph may serve as a school guardian under s. 1006.12(3) 214 only if he or she is appointed by the applicable school district 215 superintendent, charter school principal, public postsecondary 216 educational institution president, private school head of 217 school, or child care facility owner. A sheriff who conducts the 218 training for a school security guard or waives the training 219 requirements for a person under sub-subparagraph 1.g. and 220 determines that the school security guard has met all the 221 requirements of s. 1006.12(4) shall issue a school security 222 guard certificate to persons who meet the requirements of this 223 section to the satisfaction of the sheriff and shall maintain 224 documentation of weapon and equipment inspections, training, 225 certification, and qualification records for each school 226 security guard certified by the sheriff. 227 3.a.âWithin 30 days after issuing a school guardian or 228 school security guard certificate, the sheriff who issued the 229 certificate must report to the Department of Law Enforcement the 230 name, date of birth, and certification date of the school 231 guardian or school security guard. 232 b.âBy February 1 and September 1 of each school year, each 233 school district, charter school, employing security agency, 234 public postsecondary educational institution, private school, 235 and child care facility must report in the manner prescribed to 236 the Department of Law Enforcement the name, date of birth, and 237 appointment date of each person appointed as a school guardian 238 or employed as a school security guard. The school district, 239 charter school, employing security agency, public postsecondary 240 educational institution, private school, and child care facility 241 must also report in the manner prescribed to the Department of 242 Law Enforcement the date each school guardian or school security 243 guard separates from his or her appointment as a school guardian 244 or employment as a school security guard in a school. 245 c.âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall maintain a list 246 of each person appointed as a school guardian or certified as a 247 school security guard in the state. The list must include the 248 name and certification date of each school guardian and school 249 security guard and the date the person was appointed as a school 250 guardian or certified as a school security guard, including the 251 name of the school district, charter school, public 252 postsecondary educational institution, private school, or child 253 care facility in which the school guardian is appointed, or the 254 employing security agency of a school security guard, any 255 information provided pursuant to s. 1006.12(5), and, if 256 applicable, the date such person separated from his or her 257 appointment as a school guardian or the last date a school 258 security guard served in a school as of the last reporting date. 259 The Department of Law Enforcement shall remove from the list any 260 person whose training has expired pursuant to sub-subparagraph 261 1.d. 262 d.âEach sheriff shall report on a quarterly basis to the 263 Department of Law Enforcement the schedule for upcoming school 264 guardian trainings, to include guardian trainings for school 265 security guards, including the dates of the training, the 266 training locations, a contact person to register for the 267 training, and the class capacity. If no trainings are scheduled, 268 the sheriff is not required to report to the Department of Law 269 Enforcement. The Department of Law Enforcement shall publish on 270 its website a list of the upcoming school guardian trainings. 271 The Department of Law Enforcement shall update such list 272 quarterly. 273 e.âA sheriff who fails to report the information required 274 by this subparagraph may not receive reimbursement from the 275 Department of Education for school guardian trainings. Upon the 276 submission of the required information, a sheriff is deemed 277 eligible for such funding and is authorized to continue to 278 receive reimbursement for school guardian training. 279 f.âA school district, charter school, public postsecondary 280 educational institution, private school, child care facility, or 281 employing security agency that fails to report the information 282 required by this subparagraph is prohibited from operating a 283 school guardian program or employing school security guards in 284 the following school year unless the missing information is 285 provided. 286 g.âBy March 1 and October 1 of each school year, the 287 Department of Law Enforcement shall notify the Department of 288 Education of any sheriff, school district, charter school, 289 public postsecondary educational institution, private school, or 290 child care facility that has not complied with the reporting 291 requirements of this subparagraph. 292 h.âThe Department of Law Enforcement may adopt rules to 293 implement the requirements of this subparagraph, including 294 requiring additional reporting information only as necessary to 295 uniquely identify each school guardian and school security guard 296 reported. 297 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (12) of section 298 790.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 299 790.06âLicense to carry concealed weapon or concealed 300 firearm.â 301 (12)(a)âA license issued under this section does not 302 authorize any person to openly carry a handgun or carry a 303 concealed weapon or concealed firearm into: 304 1.âAny place of nuisance as defined in s. 823.05; 305 2.âAny police, sheriff, or highway patrol station; 306 3.âAny detention facility, prison, or jail; 307 4.âAny courthouse; 308 5.âAny courtroom, except that nothing in this section 309 precludes a judge from carrying a concealed weapon or concealed 310 firearm or determining who will carry a concealed weapon or 311 concealed firearm in his or her courtroom; 312 6.âAny polling place; 313 7.âAny meeting of the governing body of a county, public 314 school district, municipality, or special district; 315 8.âAny meeting of the Legislature or a committee thereof; 316 9.âAny school, college, or professional athletic event not 317 related to firearms; 318 10.âAny elementary or secondary school facility or 319 administration building; 320 11.âAny career center; 321 12.âAny portion of an establishment licensed to dispense 322 alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, which 323 portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to such 324 purpose; 325 13.âAny college or university facility unless the licensee 326 is: 327 a.âA registered student, employee, or faculty member of 328 such college or university and the weapon is a stun gun or 329 nonlethal electric weapon or device designed solely for 330 defensive purposes and the weapon does not fire a dart or 331 projectile; 332 b.âAn employee or faculty member of such college or 333 university who is not a registered student of such college or 334 university; or 335 c.âA registered student of such college or university who 336 is an employee or faculty member of the college or university. 337 This sub-subparagraph applies to a registered student at times 338 during which he or she is performing the duties of his or her 339 position as an employee or faculty member of the college or 340 university; 341 14.âThe inside of the passenger terminal and sterile area 342 of any airport, provided that no person shall be prohibited from 343 carrying any legal firearm into the terminal, which firearm is 344 encased for shipment for purposes of checking such firearm as 345 baggage to be lawfully transported on any aircraft; or 346 15.âAny place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited 347 by federal law. 348 Section 3.âEffective October 1, 2026, paragraph (d) of 349 subsection (2) of section 790.115, Florida Statutes, is amended 350 and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 351 790.115âPossessing or discharging weapons or firearms at a 352 school-sponsored event or on school property prohibited; 353 penalties; exceptions.â 354 (2) 355 (d)âA person commits a felony of the second degree, 356 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, 357 if he or she: who 358 1.âDischarges any weapon or firearm while in violation of 359 paragraph (a), unless discharged for lawful defense of himself 360 or herself or another or for a lawful purpose; or 361 2.âDischarges any weapon or firearm within 1,000 feet of a 362 school, during school hours or during the time of a sanctioned 363 school activity, unless discharged for lawful defense of himself 364 or herself or another or for a lawful purpose. This subparagraph 365 does not apply to the discharge of a weapon or firearm on 366 private real property within 1,000 feet of a school by the owner 367 of such property or by a person whose presence on such property 368 has been authorized, licensed, or invited by the owner, commits 369 a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 370 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 371 (4)âA person arrested for a violation of paragraph (2)(d) 372 must be held in custody until brought before the court for 373 admittance to bail in accordance with chapter 903. 374 Section 4.âEffective October 1, 2026, paragraph (f) of 375 subsection (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended 376 to read: 377 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 378 chart.â 379 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 380 (f)âLEVEL 6 381 382 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 383 316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash involving serious bodily injury. 384 316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent conviction. 385 316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding. 386 327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 387 400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering services requiring licensure, without a license. 388 499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction history, transaction information, or transaction statement. 389 499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of prescription drug from unauthorized person. 390 499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of prescription drug to unauthorized person. 391 775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law enforcement officer. 392 784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly weapon without intent to kill. 393 784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to commit felony. 394 784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation. 395 784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible threat. 396 784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person under 16. 397 784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law enforcement officer. 398 784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually violent predators facility staff. 399 784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person 65 years of age or older. 400 784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified official or employee. 401 784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 402 784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code inspector. 403 787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining with purpose other than those in s. 787.01. 404 787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child. 405 790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon on school property or within 1,000 feet of a school. 406 790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw destructive device with intent to do bodily harm or damage property. 407 790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, act of arson or violence to state property, or use of firearms in violent manner. 408 790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly missiles into dwellings, vessels, or vehicles. 409 794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to participate in sexual activity by custodial adult. 410 794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with specified minor. 411 800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but less than 16 years of age; offender less than 18 years. 412 800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender 18 years of age or older. 413 806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily harm to firefighter or any other person. 414 810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure; unarmed; no assault or battery. 415 810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims; 2nd or subsequent offense. 416 812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or more, but less than $100,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 417 812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree; firearm. 418 812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 419 812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen $750 or more; second or subsequent conviction. 420 812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated property stolen within 120 days is $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 421 812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 422 812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons and use of social media platform. 423 812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other weapon (strong-arm robbery). 424 817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia with intent to create cloned cellular telephones. 425 817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false report of a crime resulting in death. 426 817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more patients. 427 817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years of age or older, value $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 428 825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult. 429 825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or disabled adult. 430 825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation of an elderly person or disabled adult. 431 825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at less than $10,000. 432 827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child. 433 827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child. 434 827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or intentionally view any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 435 828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving animals. 436 836.05 2nd Threats; extortion. 437 836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats to kill, do bodily injury, or conduct a mass shooting or an act of terrorism. 438 843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to escape. 439 847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to distribute, or possessing with intent to distribute obscene materials depicting minors. 440 847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the production of materials harmful to minors. 441 847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of or with a minor or the visual depiction of such conduct. 442 893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled substances resulting in overdose or serious bodily injury. 443 914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, with bodily injury. 444 918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating physical evidence relating to a capital felony. 445 944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery upon or inflicting cruel or inhuman treatment on an inmate or offender on community supervision, resulting in great bodily harm. 446 944.40 2nd Escapes. 447 944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding escaped prisoners. 448 944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband (firearm, weapon, or explosive) into correctional facility. 449 951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced into county detention facility. 450 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 451 943.082, Florida Statutes, is amended, and a new paragraph (c) 452 is added to that subsection, to read: 453 943.082âSchool Safety Awareness Program.â 454 (4)(a)âLaw enforcement dispatch centers, school districts, 455 schools, public postsecondary educational institutions, and 456 other entities identified by the department must be made aware 457 of the mobile suspicious activity reporting tool. 458 (c)âEach public postsecondary educational institution, as 459 defined in s. 1000.04(3), shall promote the use of the mobile 460 suspicious activity reporting tool by advertising it on the 461 institution website, by installing it on all mobile devices 462 issued by the institution, and by bookmarking the website on all 463 computer devices maintained by the institution. 464 Section 6.âSubsection (4) is added to section 1003.25, 465 Florida Statutes, and subsection (2) of that section is 466 republished, to read: 467 1003.25âProcedures for maintenance and transfer of student 468 records.â 469 (2)âThe procedure for transferring and maintaining records 470 of students who transfer from school to school is prescribed by 471 rules of the State Board of Education. The transfer of records 472 must occur within 5 school days. The records must include, if 473 applicable: 474 (a)âVerified reports of serious or recurrent behavior 475 patterns, including any threat assessment report, all 476 corresponding documentation, and any other information required 477 by the Florida-specific behavioral threat assessment instrument 478 pursuant to s. 1001.212(11) which contains the evaluation, 479 intervention, and management of the threat assessment 480 evaluations and intervention services. 481 (b)âPsychological evaluations, including therapeutic 482 treatment plans and therapy or progress notes created or 483 maintained by school district or charter school staff, as 484 appropriate. 485 (4)âWhen the education records of a student contain the 486 documents described in subsection (2) and the student enrolls in 487 a Florida College System institution or state university, such 488 records must be transferred to his or her institution or 489 university of enrollment. The State Board of Education and the 490 Board of Governors shall adopt rules and regulations, 491 respectively, to establish the procedures for the transfer of a 492 studentâs threat assessment report pursuant to this subsection. 493 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (6) of section 494 1006.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 495 1006.07âDistrict school board duties relating to student 496 discipline and school safety.âThe district school board shall 497 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the 498 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper 499 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the 500 welfare of students, including: 501 (6)âSAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.âEach district 502 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures 503 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the 504 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior 505 poses a threat to the safety of the school community. 506 (a)âSchool safety specialist.âEach district school 507 superintendent shall designate a school safety specialist for 508 the district. The school safety specialist must be a school 509 administrator employed by the school district or a law 510 enforcement officer employed by the sheriffâs office located in 511 the school district. Any school safety specialist designated 512 from the sheriffâs office must first be authorized and approved 513 by the sheriff employing the law enforcement officer. Any school 514 safety specialist designated from the sheriffâs office remains 515 the employee of the office for purposes of compensation, 516 insurance, workersâ compensation, and other benefits authorized 517 by law for a law enforcement officer employed by the sheriffâs 518 office. The sheriff and the school superintendent may determine 519 by agreement the reimbursement for such costs, or may share the 520 costs, associated with employment of the law enforcement officer 521 as a school safety specialist. The school safety specialist must 522 earn a certificate of completion of the school safety specialist 523 training provided by the Office of Safe Schools within 1 year 524 after appointment and is responsible for the supervision and 525 oversight for all school safety and security personnel, 526 policies, and procedures in the school district. The school 527 safety specialist, or his or her designee, shall: 528 1.âIn conjunction with the district school superintendent, 529 annually review school district policies and procedures for 530 compliance with state law and rules, including the districtâs 531 timely and accurate submission of school environmental safety 532 incident reports to the department pursuant to s. 1001.212(8). 533 At least quarterly, the school safety specialist must report to 534 the district school superintendent and the district school board 535 any noncompliance by the school district with laws or rules 536 regarding school safety. 537 2.âProvide the necessary training and resources to students 538 and school district staff in matters relating to youth mental 539 health awareness and assistance; emergency procedures, including 540 active shooter training; and school safety and security. Such 541 training for classroom teachers and other instructional staff 542 must explain the purpose, importance, and proper execution of 543 school safety protocols and emergency procedures. 544 3.âServe as the school district liaison with local public 545 safety agencies and national, state, and community agencies and 546 organizations in matters of school safety and security. 547 4.âIn collaboration with the appropriate public safety 548 agencies, as that term is defined in s. 365.171, by October 1 of 549 each year, conduct a school security risk assessment at each 550 public school using the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool 551 developed by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s. 552 1006.1493. Based on the assessment findings, the districtâs 553 school safety specialist shall provide recommendations to the 554 district school superintendent and the district school board 555 which identify strategies and activities that the district 556 school board should implement in order to address the findings 557 and improve school safety and security. Each district school 558 board must receive such findings and the school safety 559 specialistâs recommendations at a publicly noticed district 560 school board meeting to provide the public an opportunity to 561 hear the district school board members discuss and take action 562 on the findings and recommendations. Each school safety 563 specialist, through the district school superintendent, shall 564 report such findings and school board action to the Office of 565 Safe Schools within 30 days after the district school board 566 meeting. 567 5.âConduct annual unannounced inspections, using the form 568 adopted by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s. 569 1001.212(13), of all public schools, including charter schools, 570 while school is in session and investigate reports of 571 noncompliance with school safety requirements. 572 6.âReport violations of paragraph (f) by administrative 573 personnel and instructional personnel to the district school 574 superintendent or charter school administrator, as applicable. 575 Section 8.âSection 1006.601, Florida Statutes, is created 576 to read: 577 1006.601âStudent safety.â 578 (1)âDEFINITION.âAs used in this section, the term âpublic 579 postsecondary educational institutionâ has the same meaning as 580 in s. 1000.04(3). 581 (2)âSCHOOL GUARDIANS.âPublic postsecondary educational 582 institutions are authorized to participate in the Chris Hixon, 583 Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach Scott Beigel Guardian Program and 584 may appoint certified school guardians pursuant to s. 585 30.15(1)(k). 586 (3)âSAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.â 587 (a)âResponse plans.âEach public postsecondary educational 588 institution shall: 589 1.âAdopt an active assailant response plan, including 590 methods for issuing campus-wide alerts, and annually certify 591 that all faculty, staff, and students have completed active 592 assailant preparedness training. The plan must clearly identify 593 who may issue an emergency alert. 594 2.âAdopt, in cooperation with local law enforcement 595 agencies and local government, a family reunification plan to 596 reunite students and employees with their families in the event 597 that an institution is closed or unexpectedly evacuated due to a 598 natural or manmade disaster. This reunification plan must be 599 reviewed annually and updated as necessary. 600 (b)âStudent mental health.âEach public postsecondary 601 educational institution shall: 602 1.âTrain faculty to detect and respond to mental health 603 issues as well as connect students who may experience behavioral 604 health issues with appropriate services, both on campus and in 605 the community, including crisis intervention. 606 2.âPost on its website and in conspicuous locations at each 607 institution a mental health awareness and suicide prevention 608 sign that identifies ways a person can access help and services. 609 Physical signs must be at least 11 inches by 15 inches in size 610 and must be printed in an easily legible font and in at least 611 32-point type. 612 3.âEstablish threat management teams whose duties include 613 the coordination of resources and assessment and intervention 614 with students whose behavior may pose a threat to the safety of 615 the institution, institution staff, or students. The threat 616 management team must use the statewide behavioral threat 617 management operational process and Florida-specific behavioral 618 threat assessment instrument developed by the Office of Safe 619 Schools pursuant to s. 1001.212(11) or another comparable tool 620 deemed appropriate for postsecondary institutions by the State 621 Board of Education and Board of Governors. 622 623 The Commissioner of Education and the Chancellor of the State 624 University System shall provide guidance on when and how 625 administrators, mental health providers, and other appropriate 626 personnel are legally entitled to share and receive information 627 about individuals who may be a threat to themselves or others, 628 including, but not limited to, the transmission of education 629 records pursuant to s. 1003.25(4). 630 (c)âSecurity risk assessment.âEach public postsecondary 631 educational institution, in collaboration with appropriate 632 public safety agencies as defined in s. 365.171(3)(d), shall 633 annually conduct a security risk assessment at each campus using 634 the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool developed by the Office 635 of Safe Schools pursuant to s. 1006.1493 or another comparable 636 tool deemed appropriate for postsecondary institutions by the 637 State Board of Education and Board of Governors. Subject to an 638 appropriation, the institution may apply for grant funds for 639 security improvements to its campus based on findings in the 640 security risk assessment. 641 (4)âRULES AND REGULATIONS.âThe State Board of Education and 642 the Board of Governors may adopt rules and regulations, 643 respectively, to implement this section. 644 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 645 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a 646 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (19) of section 647 402.305, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 648 402.305âLicensing standards; child care facilities.â 649 (19)âSAFE-SCHOOL OFFICERS.â 650 (a)âA child care facility may partner with a law 651 enforcement agency or a security agency to establish or assign 652 one or more safe-school officers established in s. 1006.12(1) 653 (4). The child care facility is responsible for the full cost of 654 implementing any such option, which includes all training costs 655 under the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach Scott Beigel 656 Guardian Program under s. 30.15(1)(k). 657 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 658 made by this act to section 790.06, Florida Statutes, in a 659 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 790.013, Florida 660 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 661 790.013âCarrying of concealed weapons or concealed firearms 662 without a license.âA person who carries a concealed weapon or 663 concealed firearm without a license as authorized under s. 664 790.01(1)(b): 665 (2)âIs subject to s. 790.06(12) in the same manner as a 666 person who is licensed to carry a concealed weapon or concealed 667 firearm. 668 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 669 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a 670 reference thereto, section 843.08, Florida Statutes, is 671 reenacted to read: 672 843.08âFalse personation.âA person who falsely assumes or 673 pretends to be a firefighter, a sheriff, an officer of the 674 Florida Highway Patrol, an officer of the Fish and Wildlife 675 Conservation Commission, an officer of the Department of 676 Environmental Protection, an officer of the Department of 677 Financial Services, any personnel or representative of the 678 Division of Criminal Investigations, an officer of the 679 Department of Corrections, a correctional probation officer, a 680 deputy sheriff, a state attorney or an assistant state attorney, 681 a statewide prosecutor or an assistant statewide prosecutor, a 682 state attorney investigator, a coroner, a police officer, a 683 lottery special agent or lottery investigator, a beverage 684 enforcement agent, a school guardian as described in s. 685 30.15(1)(k), a security officer licensed under chapter 493, any 686 member of the Florida Commission on Offender Review or any 687 administrative aide or supervisor employed by the commission, 688 any personnel or representative of the Department of Law 689 Enforcement, or a federal law enforcement officer as defined in 690 s. 901.1505, and takes upon himself or herself to act as such, 691 or to require any other person to aid or assist him or her in a 692 matter pertaining to the duty of any such officer, commits a 693 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 694 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. However, a person who 695 falsely personates any such officer during the course of the 696 commission of a felony commits a felony of the second degree, 697 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 698 If the commission of the felony results in the death or personal 699 injury of another human being, the person commits a felony of 700 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 701 775.083, or s. 775.084. In determining whether a defendant has 702 violated this section, the court or jury may consider any 703 relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, whether the 704 defendant used lights in violation of s. 316.2397 or s. 843.081. 705 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 706 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a 707 reference thereto, subsection (16) of section 943.03, Florida 708 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 709 943.03âDepartment of Law Enforcement.â 710 (16)âUpon request, the department shall consult with 711 sheriffs to provide input regarding programmatic guiding 712 principles, practices, and resources in order to assist in the 713 development and implementation of the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron 714 Feis, and Coach Scott Beigel Guardian Program established 715 pursuant to s. 30.15. Such input and guidance may include, but 716 need not be limited to, standards, curriculum, instructional 717 strategies, evaluation, certification, records retention, 718 equipment, and other resource needs. 719 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 720 made by this act to sections 943.082 and 1006.07, Florida 721 Statutes, in references thereto, subsections (1), (4), and (10) 722 of section 1001.212, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 723 1001.212âOffice of Safe Schools.âThere is created in the 724 Department of Education the Office of Safe Schools. The office 725 is fully accountable to the Commissioner of Education. The 726 office shall serve as a central repository for best practices, 727 training standards, and compliance oversight in all matters 728 regarding school safety and security, including prevention 729 efforts, intervention efforts, and emergency preparedness 730 planning. The office shall: 731 (1)âEstablish and update as necessary a school security 732 risk assessment tool for use by school districts pursuant to s. 733 1006.07(6). The office shall make the security risk assessment 734 tool available for use by charter schools. The office shall 735 provide annual training to appropriate school district and 736 charter school personnel on the proper assessment of physical 737 site security and completion of the school security risk 738 assessment tool. 739 (4)âDevelop and implement a School Safety Specialist 740 Training Program for school safety specialists appointed 741 pursuant to s. 1006.07(6). The office shall develop the training 742 program which shall be based on national and state best 743 practices on school safety and security and must include active 744 shooter training. The office shall develop training modules in 745 traditional or online formats. A school safety specialist 746 certificate of completion shall be awarded to a school safety 747 specialist who satisfactorily completes the training required by 748 rules of the office. 749 (10)âDisseminate, in consultation with the Department of 750 Law Enforcement, to participating schools awareness and 751 education materials on the proper use of the School Safety 752 Awareness Program developed pursuant to s. 943.082, including 753 the consequences of knowingly submitting false information. 754 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 755 made by this act to section 30.15, Florida Statutes, in a 756 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraph 757 (a) of subsection (4), and subsection (7) of section 1006.12, 758 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 759 1006.12âSafe-school officers at each public school.âFor the 760 protection and safety of school personnel, property, students, 761 and visitors, each district school board and school district 762 superintendent shall partner with law enforcement agencies or 763 security agencies to establish or assign one or more safe-school 764 officers at each school facility within the district, including 765 charter schools. A district school board must collaborate with 766 charter school governing boards to facilitate charter school 767 access to all safe-school officer options available under this 768 section. The school district may implement any combination of 769 the options in subsections (1)-(4) to best meet the needs of the 770 school district and charter schools. 771 (3)âSCHOOL GUARDIAN.â 772 (a)âAt the school districtâs or the charter school 773 governing boardâs discretion, as applicable, pursuant to s. 774 30.15, a school district or charter school governing board may 775 participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach 776 Scott Beigel Guardian Program to meet the requirement of 777 establishing a safe-school officer. The following individuals 778 may serve as a school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned 779 activities for purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory 780 completion of the requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and 781 certification by a sheriff: 782 1.âA school district employee or personnel, as defined 783 under s. 1012.01, or a charter school employee, as provided 784 under s. 1002.33(12)(a), who volunteers to serve as a school 785 guardian in addition to his or her official job duties; or 786 2.âAn employee of a school district or a charter school who 787 is hired for the specific purpose of serving as a school 788 guardian. 789 (4)âSCHOOL SECURITY GUARD.âA school district or charter 790 school governing board may contract with a security agency as 791 defined in s. 493.6101(18) to employ as a school security guard 792 an individual who holds a Class âDâ and Class âGâ license 793 pursuant to chapter 493, provided the following training and 794 contractual conditions are met: 795 (a)âAn individual who serves as a school security guard, 796 for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section, 797 must: 798 1.âDemonstrate completion of 144 hours of required training 799 conducted by a sheriff pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2. 800 2.âPass a psychological evaluation administered by a 801 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the 802 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the 803 evaluation to the sheriffâs office and school district, charter 804 school governing board, or employing security agency, as 805 applicable. The Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to 806 provide the sheriffâs office, school district, charter school 807 governing board, or employing security agency with mental health 808 and substance abuse data for compliance with this paragraph. 809 3.âSubmit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent 810 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s. 811 112.0455 and the sheriffâs office, school district, charter 812 school governing board, or employing security agency, as 813 applicable. 814 4.âBe approved to work as a school security guard by the 815 sheriff of each county in which the school security guard will 816 be assigned to a school before commencing work at any school in 817 that county. The sheriffâs approval authorizes the security 818 agency to assign the school security guard to any school in the 819 county, and the sheriffâs approval is not limited to any 820 particular school. 821 5.âSuccessfully complete ongoing training, weapon 822 inspection, and firearm qualification conducted by a sheriff 823 pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.e. on at least an annual basis and 824 provide documentation to the sheriffâs office, school district, 825 charter school governing board, or employing security agency, as 826 applicable. 827 (7)âLIMITATIONS.âAn individual must satisfy the background 828 screening, psychological evaluation, and drug test requirements 829 and be approved by the sheriff before participating in any 830 training required by s. 30.15(1)(k), which may be conducted only 831 by a sheriff. 832 833 If a district school board, through its adopted policies, 834 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any 835 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school 836 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety 837 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the 838 charter schoolâs share of the costs of the school resource 839 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school 840 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s. 841 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district. 842 Section 15.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 843 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.